Utah statutes.
19-9-106.   Acquisition of sites by authority -- Property vested in state on
disincorporation of authority.
(1)  The authority is authorized, pursuant to Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5,
Eminent Domain, to acquire sites sufficient in number to meet the hazardous
waste treatment, storage, and disposal needs of the state if, in the judgment
of the authority, private operators are not adequately meeting such needs.
Exercise of the power of eminent domain to acquire such sites is declared to
be for a public purpose and use.
(2)  Before the purchase or condemnation of any site by the authority, the
board shall certify that the site meets the standards for eventual
incorporation into an approved hazardous waste operations plan.
(3)  If the authority is disincorporated for any reason, all its property
shall vest in, and become the property of, the state, which shall succeed to
all the rights and liabilities of the authority which exist at the time of
vestiture in the state.
